Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2305
Appeal; dismissed; conviction affirmed; procedure; defendant; credit for time incarcerated.

If the appeal in such case is dismissed or the conviction is affirmed on hearing, such judgment shall be executed by the court by which it was rendered on receipt of the mandate of the appellate court. A defendant who was not admitted to bail during the time the appeal was pending shall receive credit against the sentence for all of the time he or she was incarcerated while the appeal was pending.

G.S.1873, c. 58, §§ 506, 507, p. 834;

R.S.1913, § 9176;

C.S.1922, § 10183;

C.S.1929, § 29-2305;

R.S.1943, § 29-2305;

Laws 1982, LB 722, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 77.